Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1819
Local safety standards; authorized.

The governing board of any city, county, or village may establish and enforce safety standards for amusement rides in addition to, but not in conflict with, the standards established by the commissioner pursuant to the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 19.